Utah statutes.
53-3-907.   Licensing skills test exemption.

(1)  The division may exempt an applicant for a motorcycle operator license or endorsement from the licensing skills test if he presents proof of successful completion of a rider training course approved by the division that includes a similar test of skills.

(2)  The exemption provided in Subsection (1) applies only if the applicant applies for a motorcycle operator license or endorsement within six months of completion of an approved rider training course.

